tools/dpl/test-hr_HR.aff
FLAG long
SFX EZ Y 7
SFX EZ 0 0 .	+NAjd 
SFX EZ io jela .	+GjdGmn 
SFX EZ io jelu .	+DLjd 
SFX EZ io jele .	+VjdAmn 
SFX EZ io jelom .	+Ijd 
SFX EZ io jeli .	+NVmn 
SFX EZ io jelima .	+DLImn 

SFX FA Y 7
SFX FA 0 0 .	+NAVjd 
SFX FA 0 ja .	+GjdGmn 
SFX FA 0 ju .	+DLjd 
SFX FA 0 jem .	+Ijd 
SFX FA 0 ji .	+NVmn 
SFX FA 0 jima .	+DLImn 
SFX FA 0 je .	+Amn 

SFX FB Y 7
SFX FB ko ci .	+NVjd 
SFX FB o a .	+GAjdGmn 
SFX FB o u .	+DLjd 
SFX FB 0 m .	+Ijd 
SFX FB ko aka .	+Gmn 
SFX FB ko cima .	+DLImn 
SFX FB o e .	+Amn 
